Tennessee, session 114, HB0766.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-2410, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection (c) and redesignating the existing subsections accordingly:
(c) Upon the filing of suits to enforce the tax lien against real or personal
property, an additional penalty of five percent (5%) upon all delinquent taxes accrues,
and the penalty is imposed upon the amount due from any defendant to the state,
county, or municipality, which penalty must be devoted to providing tax relief for the
homeowners who are elderly low-income, disabled, or a disabled veteran or widow of a
disabled veteran, pursuant to part 7 of this chapter. Such penalty must be computed on
the base amount of delinquent taxes, not including accrued interest or penalties.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0766
002349
- 1 -